src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
! Die Deklinationsklassen

LEXICON s1m
+N+Msc: s1 ;
s1m; ! remove this stupid line, testing only.
LEXICON s1n
+N+Neu: s1 ;

LEXICON s2m
+N+Msc: s2 ;

LEXICON s2n
+N+Neu: s2 ;


LEXICON s3f
+N+Fem: s3 ;


LEXICON s4m
+N+Msc: s4 ;


LEXICON s4n
+N+Neu: s4 ;

LEXICON s5m
!! Boden
+N+Msc: s5 ;

LEXICON s5m_NOT-IN-N
!! Bruder, Apfel
+N+Msc: s5_NOT-IN-N ;

LEXICON s5n
+N+Neu: s5 ;

LEXICON s5n_NOT-IN-N
+N+Neu: s5_NOT-IN-N ;


LEXICON s6m
+N+Msc: s6 ;

LEXICON s6m_NOT-IN-N
+N+Msc: s6_NOT-IN-N ;

LEXICON s6n
+N+Neu: s6 ;

LEXICON s6n_NOT-IN-N
+N+Neu: s6_NOT-IN-N ;

LEXICON w1m
+N+Msc: w1 ;


LEXICON w2f
+N+Fem: w2 ;


LEXICON w3m
+N+Msc: w3 ;

LEXICON w3m_BUMMEL
+N+Msc: w3_BUMMEL ;


LEXICON w3n
+N+Neu: w3 ;


LEXICON w4m
+N+Msc: w4 ;


LEXICON w4n
+N+Neu: w4 ;

LEXICON s5f
+N+Fem: s5_NOT-IN-N ;
!+N+Sg: NULL ;
!+N+Pl:%^Umlaut s-n-Pl ;

! Numerus

LEXICON s1
+Sg: sSg ;
+Pl:%^Umlaut s-en-Pl ;

LEXICON s2
+Sg: sSg ;
+Pl:%^Umlaut s-ern-Pl ;

LEXICON s3
+Sg: NULL ;
+Pl:%^Umlaut s-en-Pl ;

LEXICON s4
+Sg: sSg ;
+Pl: s-en-Pl ;

LEXICON s5
+Sg: s-Sg ;
+Pl:%^Umlaut NULL ;

LEXICON s5_NOT-IN-N
+Sg: s-Sg ;
+Pl:%^Umlaut s-n-Pl ;

LEXICON s6
+Sg: s-Sg ;
+Pl: s-en-Pl ; !! CHECKME

LEXICON s6_NOT-IN-N
+Sg: s-Sg ;
+Pl: s-n-Pl ;

LEXICON w1
+Sg: wSg ;
+Pl: wPl ;

LEXICON w2
+Sg: NULL ;
+Pl:  wPl ;

LEXICON w3
+Sg: s-Sg ;
+Pl: wPl ;

LEXICON w3_BUMMEL
+Sg: s-Sg ;
+Pl: wPl_N ;

LEXICON w4
+Sg: w-ns-Sg ;
+Pl: wPl ;

! Kasus

LEXICON sSg
+Nom: # ;
+Gen:%>s # ;
+Gen:%>es # ;
+Dat: # ;
+Dat:%>e # ;
+Acc: # ;

LEXICON s-en-Pl
+Nom:%>e # ;
+Gen:%>e # ;
+Dat:%>en # ;
+Acc:%>e # ;

LEXICON s-ern-Pl
+Nom:%>e # ;
+Gen:%>e # ;
+Dat:%>ern # ;
+Acc:%>er # ;

LEXICON NULL
+Nom:%> # ;
+Gen:%> # ;
+Dat:%> # ;
+Acc:%> # ;

LEXICON s-Sg
+Nom: # ;
+Gen:%>s # ;
+Dat: # ;
+Acc: # ;

LEXICON s-n-Pl
+Nom:%> # ;
+Gen:%> # ;
+Dat:%>n # ;
+Acc:%> # ;

LEXICON wSg
+Nom:%> # ;
+Gen:%>en # ;
+Dat:%>en # ;
+Acc:%>en # ;

LEXICON wPl
+Nom:%>en # ;
+Gen:%>en # ;
+Dat:%>en # ;
+Acc:%>en # ;

LEXICON wPl_N
+Nom:%>n # ;
+Gen:%>n # ;
+Dat:%>n # ;
+Acc:%>n # ;


LEXICON w-ns-Sg
+Nom:%>en # ;
+Gen:%>ens # ;
+Dat:%>en # ;
+Acc:%>en # ;

LEXICON Cases
+Nom: # ;
+Gen: # ;
+Dat: # ;
+Acc: # ;


!! these are from Apertium
LEXICON Aal__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON /Aas__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abc__n_nt 
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Abdr/uck__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON Abend__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abenteuer__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACC/DATn/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abenteurer__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACC/DATn/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Aberglauben__n_m
!--FIXME-->
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: 0s-SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abf/all__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abfl/uss__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abfl/uß__n_m
!-- ß = ss --><!-- ß = ss -->
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abfolge__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCn/DATn/GENn/NOMn ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abfuhr__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCen/DATen/GENen/NOMen ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Ahnung__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCen/DATen/GENen/NOMen ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: 0s-SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abgas__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abgr/und__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON Abhilfe__n_f 
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abi__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abitur__n_nt 
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abiturient__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCen/DATen/GENen/NOMen ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACCen/DATen/GENen/NOM ;
+N: 0en-PL-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abkommen__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Abl/auf__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abl/uft__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abriss__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abri/ß__n_m
!-- ß = ss --><!-- ß = ss -->
+N+Msc: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abs/atz__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abschied__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: 0s-SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abspr/ung__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abst/and__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON /Abt__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON Abteil__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abw/asser__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQ/DATQn/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Abw/urf__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON Abz/ug__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON /Acker__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQ/DATQn/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Aderl/ass__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Aderl/aß__n_m
!-- ß = ss --><!-- ß = ss -->
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Administrator__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCen/DATen/GENen/NOMen ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Admir/al__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON Adverb__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCien/DATien/GENien/NOMien ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Affe__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCn/DATn/GENn/NOMn ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACCn/DATn/GENn/NOM ;
+N: 0n-SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Affront__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Ag__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Aggregat__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Aggressor__n_m
!--FIXME-->
+N+Msc: PL-ACCen/DATen/GENen/NOMen ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON Airbus__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCse/DATsen/GENse/NOMse ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENses/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATse ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Alt/ar__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Altert/um__n_nt 
!--FIXME-->
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: 0s-SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Amm/ann__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
