src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns 
Fall s1m ;
Napf s1m ;
Hof s1m ;
Floß s1n ;
Rand s2m ;
Mund s2m ; 
Wurm s2m ;
Loch s2n ;
Brett s2n ;
Rind s2n ;
Faust s3f ;
Kuh   s3f ;
Stadt s3f ;
Docht s4m ;
Fisch s4m ;
Gurt  s4m ;
Kamel s4n ;
Pergament s4n ;
Moor s4n ;
Bogen   s5m ;
Bruder  s5m ;
Hafen   s5m ;
Mutter  s5f ;
Tochter s5f ;
Kloster s5n ;
Meister	  s6m ;
Bengel	  s6m ;
Ukrainer  s6m ;
Feuer	  s6n ;
Becken	  s6n ;
Rudel	  s6n ;
Sextant w1m ; 
Konkurrent w1m ; 
Philosoph w1m ; 
Mur w2f ; 
Marmelade w2f ; 
Turbine w2f ; 
Schmerz w3m ;
Pfau w3n ;
Ohr w3n ;
Staat w3n ;
Same w4m ; 
Glaube w4m ; 
Gedanke w4m ;
Herz w4n ;
Quere:Quere Abhilfe__n_f ;
Heimkehr:Heimkehr Abhilfe__n_f ;
Theaterrolle:Theaterrolle Abfolge__n_f ;
Stätte:Stätte Abfolge__n_f ;
Bigband:Bigband Ag__n_f ;
Couch:Couch Ag__n_f ;
Abmachung:Abmachung Ahnung__n_f ;
Berechnung:Berechnung Ahnung__n_f ;
Qualifikation:Qualifikation Abfuhr__n_f ;
Widrigkeit:Widrigkeit Abfuhr__n_f ;
Abluft:Abluft Abl/uft__n_f ;
Freiluft:Freiluft Abl/uft__n_f ;
Abschied:Abschied Abschied__n_m ;
Krieg:Krieg Abschied__n_m ;
Tatbestand:Tatbestand Abst/and__n_m ;
Vorstand:Vorstand Abst/and__n_m ;
Knoblauch:Knoblauch Abend__n_m ;
Sportverein:Sportverein Abend__n_m ;
Monat:Monat Abend__n_m ;
Untergrund:Untergrund Abgr/und__n_m ;
Hauptgrund:Hauptgrund Abgr/und__n_m ;
Onkologe:Onkologe Affe__n_m ;
Katalane:Katalane Affe__n_m ;
Anwurf:Anwurf Abw/urf__n_m ;
Entwurf:Entwurf Abw/urf__n_m ;
Ausverkauf:Ausverkauf Abl/auf__n_m ;
Vorlauf:Vorlauf Abl/auf__n_m ;
Fallschirmsprung:Fallschirmsprung Abspr/ung__n_m ;
Schwung:Schwung Abspr/ung__n_m ;
Bezug:Bezug Abz/ug__n_m ;
Einzug:Einzug Abz/ug__n_m ;
Fingerabdruck:Fingerabdruck Abdr/uck__n_m ;
Eindruck:Eindruck Abdr/uck__n_m ;
Gesichtsausdruck:Gesichtsausdruck Abdr/uck__n_m ;
Kardinal:Kardinal Admir/al__n_m ;
Admiral:Admiral Admir/al__n_m ;
Leich:Leich Aal__n_m ;
Apfelwein:Apfelwein Aal__n_m ;
Dienst:Dienst Aal__n_m ;
Abfall:Abfall Abf/all__n_m ;
Anfall:Anfall Abf/all__n_m ;
Notfall:Notfall Abf/all__n_m ;
Funk:Funk Aberglauben__n_m ;
Hohn:Hohn Aberglauben__n_m ;
Milchmann:Milchmann Amm/ann__n_m ;
Feuerwehrmann:Feuerwehrmann Amm/ann__n_m ;
Altar:Altar Alt/ar__n_m ;
Acker:Acker /Acker__n_m ;
Wellenbrecher:Wellenbrecher Abenteurer__n_m ;
Hausierer:Hausierer Abenteurer__n_m ;
Indikator:Indikator Aggressor__n_m ;
Schuldirektor:Schuldirektor Aggressor__n_m ;
Auktionator:Auktionator Administrator__n_m ;
Grundherr:Grundherr Administrator__n_m ;
Aas:Aas /Aas__n_m ;
Preisnachlass:Preisnachlass Aderl/ass__n_m ;
Reisepass:Reisepass Aderl/ass__n_m ;
Wels:Wels Abriss__n_m ;
Schlangenbiss:Schlangenbiss Abriss__n_m ;
Einfluss:Einfluss Abfl/uss__n_m ;
Entschluss:Entschluss Abfl/uss__n_m ;
Flughafenbus:Flughafenbus Airbus__n_m ;
Krokus:Krokus Airbus__n_m ;
Abt:Abt /Abt__n_m ;
Elefant:Elefant Abiturient__n_m ;
Kolumnist:Kolumnist Abiturient__n_m ;
Bikini:Bikini Affront__n_m ;
Turbo:Turbo Affront__n_m ;
Entsorgungsplatz:Entsorgungsplatz Abs/atz__n_m ;
Ansatz:Ansatz Abs/atz__n_m ;
Prozeß:Prozeß Abri/ß__n_m ;
Imbiß:Imbiß Abri/ß__n_m ;
Nachlaß:Nachlaß Aderl/aß__n_m ;
Einlaß:Einlaß Aderl/aß__n_m ;
Einfluß:Einfluß Abfl/uß__n_m ;
Entschluß:Entschluß Abfl/uß__n_m ;
Material:Material Adverb__n_nt ;
Informationsmaterial:Informationsmaterial Adverb__n_nt ;
e-Moll:e-Moll Abc__n_nt ;
Verhalten:Verhalten Abc__n_nt ;
Chaos:Chaos Abc__n_nt ;
Rumpsteak:Rumpsteak Abi__n_nt ;
Graffito:Graffito Abi__n_nt ;
Bordell:Bordell Abteil__n_nt ;
Pentagon:Pentagon Abteil__n_nt ;
Altertum:Altertum Altert/um__n_nt ;
Bistum:Bistum Altert/um__n_nt ;
Schnippchen:Schnippchen Abkommen__n_nt ;
Weihnachtsessen:Weihnachtsessen Abkommen__n_nt ;
Abwasser:Abwasser Abw/asser__n_nt ;
Mineralwasser:Mineralwasser Abw/asser__n_nt ;
Spanferkel:Spanferkel Abenteuer__n_nt ;
Puder:Puder Abenteuer__n_nt ;
Wolfram:Wolfram Abitur__n_nt ;
Nachrangigsein:Nachrangigsein Abitur__n_nt ;
Telekommunikationsnetz:Telekommunikations#netz Abgas__n_nt ;
Parteiengesetz:Parteien#gesetz Abgas__n_nt ;
Gestrüpp:Gestrüpp Aggregat__n_nt ;
Immediatvortragsrecht:Immediatvortragsrecht Aggregat__n_nt ;
